Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 40
BUREAU OF MINES

34-40-100.3 to 34-40-123. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article repealed, p. 1199, § 10, effective May 3.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 32 of chapter 92, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1988, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.